New York, session 2025-2026, S6871.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (c) of section 6 of section 1 of chapter 174 of 2 the laws of 1968 constituting the New York state urban development 3 corporation act is amended to read as follows: 4 (c) to any other person, firm, partnership or corporation, without 5 public bidding or public sale, provided there is published in at least 6 one newspaper of general circulation in the municipality in which the 7 project is located a notice which shall include a statement of the iden- 8 tity of the proposed purchaser or lessee and of [his] the proposed use 9 or reuse of the land use improvement project area or applicable portion 10 thereof, the price or rental to be paid by such purchaser or lessee, all 11 other essential conditions of such sale or lease, and a statement that a 12 public hearing upon such sale or lease will be held before the corpo- 13 ration at a specified time and place on a date not less than [ten] thir- 14 ty days after such publication, and provided further that such public 15 hearing is held in accordance with such notice. 16 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 8 of section 1 of chapter 174 of the 17 laws of 1968 constituting the New York state urban development corpo- 18 ration act is amended to read as follows: 19 (2) Before any sale or lease of all or a substantial part of a project 20 as authorized by subdivision one of this section is consummated, there 21 shall be published in at least one newspaper of general circulation in 22 the municipality in which the project is located a notice which shall 23 include a statement of the identity of the proposed purchaser or lessee, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04917-01-5 S. 6871 2 1 the price or rental to be paid, all other essential conditions of such 2 sale or lease, and a statement that a public hearing upon such sale or 3 lease will be held before the corporation at a specified time and place 4 on a date not less than [ten] thirty days after such publication, and 5 such hearing shall be held in accordance with such notice; provided, 6 however, that if the corporation determines that trade secrets or other 7 confidential information about the prospective purchaser's or lessee's 8 business operations, products, processes or designs would otherwise be 9 revealed by such public notice and public hearing, the requirements of 10 this subdivision may be waived by unanimous vote of the directors of the 11 corporation. 12 § 3. Subdivision 2 of section 14 of section 1 of chapter 174 of the 13 laws of 1968 constituting the New York state urban development corpo- 14 ration act, as amended by chapter 576 of the laws of 1969, is amended to 15 read as follows: 16 (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of any general, special or local 17 law or charter, any municipality, by resolution of its local governing 18 body, is hereby empowered without referendum, public auction, sealed 19 bids or public notice, to sell, lease for a term not exceeding ninety- 20 nine years, grant or convey to the corporation any real property owned 21 by it which the corporation shall certify to be necessary or convenient 22 for its corporate purposes. Any such sale, lease, grant or conveyance 23 shall be made with or without consideration and upon such terms and 24 conditions as may be agreed upon by such municipality and the corpo- 25 ration. Certification shall be evidenced by a formal request from the 26 president of the corporation. Before any such sale, lease, grant or 27 conveyance may be made to the corporation, a public hearing shall be 28 held by the local governing body to consider the same. Notice of such 29 hearing shall be published at least [ten] fourteen business days before 30 the date set for the hearing in such publication and in such manner as 31 may be designated by the local governing body. 32 § 4. Subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 33 16 of section 1 of chapter 174 of the laws of 1968 constituting the New 34 York state urban development corporation act, as amended by chapter 732 35 of the laws of 1990, is amended to read as follows: 36 (iii) in any city having a population of one million or more, provide 37 to any community board in which the project will be located, a notice 38 that such plan will be filed upon its adoption by the corporation and 39 that digests thereof will be available, which notice shall also state 40 that a public hearing will be held to consider the plan at a specified 41 time and place on a date not less than [ten] fourteen business days 42 after such publication; 43 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.